Wyoming, session 2025, SF0149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-231(a), (b)(intro) and (c) is
amended to read:
31-2-231. Wildlife conservation license plates;
wildlife conservation account; authority to receive and
expend monies.
(a) Any person required to register a vehicle in
Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the
department or county treasurer for a statement of
eligibility for wildlife conservation license plates for
any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or
multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by that person upon
registration of the vehicle. The department or county
treasurer may include as part of the application the option
for the applicant to donate an additional amount in support
of wildlife conservation efforts related to the
transportation system. Upon payment by the applicant of a
fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) to the
department or county treasurer, plus any additional
voluntary amount, the department or county treasurer shall
issue a written statement of eligibility for wildlife
conservation license plates. The department or county
treasurer shall assess an annual fee of fifty dollars
($50.00) for a person to retain eligibility for wildlife
conservation plates, but this annual fee shall not be
charged in the year the person pays the one hundred fifty
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0149
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
dollars ($150.00) eligibility fee. The person may submit an
additional voluntary amount in support of wildlife
conservation efforts related to the transportation system
when remitting the annual fee.
(b) The fees collected under subsection (a) of this
section shall be payable to the department or county
treasurer and shall be accounted for separately. Except as
otherwise provided by law, the fees collected under
subsection (a) of this section and funds collected under
W.S. 23-2-101(p), 23-2-201(h), 23-2-306(d), 24-1-131(b),
31-2-225(a)(vi), 31-2-404(f)(ii), 31-2-409(h)(ii),
31-2-703(e)(ii), 31-3-101(j), 31-7-111(b)(xiv) and
36-4-121(t) shall be distributed to the wildlife
conservation account within the state highway fund, which
is hereby created. The wildlife conservation account shall
be administered in accordance with the following:
(c) Applicants shall apply at least thirty (30) days
before registration is required for the vehicle for which
the plates are intended. Except as provided in this
section, application for, issuance and renewal of the
wildlife conservation license plates under this section
shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as
provided in this article in addition to the fee collected
under subsection (a) of this section. The license plate
fees required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany
each application. The license plates under this section
shall be issued by the county treasurer of each county and
shall be displayed only upon the vehicle for which they are
issued.
Section 2. The department of transportation shall
adopt all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0149
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3